Massachusetts, session 194th, H2140.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, there shall
be a special commission established to conduct a study and make recommendations on the
barriers faced by low-income workers to finding and maintaining jobs in the commonwealth. The
commission shall consist of 17 members, as follows: the house and senate chairs of the joint
committee on labor and workforce development, who shall serve as co-chairs; the secretary of
executive office of labor and workforce development or their designee; the secretary of the
executive office of transportation or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of
economic development or their designee; the director of the department of transitional assistance
or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of health and human services or their
designee; 2 members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 2 members
appointed by the president of the senate; 6 persons appointed by the co-chairs, 2 of whom shall
of 2

be members of the labor community, 2 of whom shall be members of the business community;
and 2 of whom shall have expertise working with low-income workers.
(b) The commission shall examine and make recommendations on topics including, but
not limited to: (i) barriers that exist in Massachusetts that prevent low-income workers from
finding and retaining jobs with sustainable wages; (ii) strategies that the commonwealth could
employ that would help to address barriers to job retention for low-income workers; (iii)
Massachusetts laws and regulations that are currently in place, or could be put in place, that
assist or hamper this population from maintaining jobs with a sustainable wage; (iv) holistic and
wraparound service approaches and programs that the commonwealth could explore to prevent a
fragmented and inefficient response to addressing these barriers; and (v) the financial
repercussions of and recommended formulaic assistance to mitigate the “cliff effect” in which
low-income persons securing minimal income increases suddenly become ineligible for critical
benefits programs that are needed to support themselves and their families.
(c) The commission may hold hearings and invite testimony from experts and the public
to gather information. The commission may involve other experts, stakeholders and members of
the public in its work through listening and working group sessions or whatever other
mechanisms the commission chooses.
(d) The commission shall file its recommendations, including any drafts of legislation or
regulations necessary to carry out its recommendations, not later than March 1, 2027.
of 2